Nevada, session 83, SB297.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. 1. The month of October of each year is designated
as “Menopause Awareness Month” in this State.
2. The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation
encouraging the observance of Menopause Awareness Month.
The proclamation must, without limitation, call upon news media,
health care providers, educators, nonprofit groups and
foundations, appropriate governmental officers and other public
and private entities to:
(a) Bring to the attention of the residents of this State factual
information and educational programs regarding menopause; and
(b) Promote access to quality health care during menopause to
support the optimal health and well-being of Nevadans.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)